Utah statutes.
78B-3-102.   Injury of a child -- Suit by parent or guardian.

(1)  Except as provided in Title 34A, Chapter 2, Workers' Compensation Act, a parent or guardian may bring an action for the injury of a minor child when the injury is caused by the wrongful act or neglect of another.

(2)  A civil action may be maintained against the person causing the injury or, if the person is employed by another person who is responsible for that person's conduct, also against the employer.

(3)  If a parent, stepparent, adoptive parent, or legal guardian is the alleged defendant in an action for the injury of a child, a guardian ad litem may be appointed for the injured child according to the procedures outlined in Section 78A-2-228.



Amended by Chapter 223, 2012 General Session

